Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.330

Investigations—Powers of director.

For the purpose of making investigations as provided for in RCW 16.65.320, the director may enter a public livestock market and examine any records required under the provisions of this chapter. The director shall have full authority to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses before him or her, together with all books, memorandums, papers, and other documents relative to the matters under investigation, and to administer oaths and take testimony thereunder.

[ 2011 c 336 s 434; 1959 c 107 s 33.]